Utah statutes.
34A-8a-202.   Rulemaking authority.

The commission may provide for the administration of this chapter by rule in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 158, 2009 General Session

